Utah statutes.
16-16-817.   Committees.

(1)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint one or more individuals to serve on a committee.

(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, an individual appointed to serve on a committee of a limited cooperative association need not be a director or member.

(3)  An individual who is not a director and is serving on a committee has the same rights, duties, and obligations as a director serving on the committee.

(4)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, each committee of a limited cooperative association may exercise the powers delegated to it by the board of directors, but a committee may not:

(a)  approve allocations or distributions except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors;

(b)  approve or propose to members action requiring approval of members; or

(c)  fill vacancies on the board of directors or any of its committees.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

